District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-4710

Group policies — General requirements.

Repealed.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1164, ch. 672, ch. V, § 10
July 2, 1940, 54 Stat. 726, ch. 518
July 12, 1950, 64 Stat. 330, ch. 457, § 1
July 5, 1960, 74 Stat. 315, 316, Pub. L. 86-579, §§ 1-5
Sept. 14, 1961, 75 Stat. 519, Pub. L. 87-249, § 1
Oct. 23, 1962, 76 Stat. 1131, Pub. L. 87-855, §§ 1, 2
Sept. 20, 1966, 80 Stat. 821, Pub. L. 89-594, § 1
Aug. 14, 1973, 87 Stat. 304, Pub. L. 93-89, title III, § 301
Feb. 23, 1980, D.C. Law 3-52, § 3, 27 DCR 26
Dec. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 4-55, § 2, 28 DCR 4649
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 43, 36 DCR 492
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 31, 40 DCR 6311
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 2302(a), 50 DCR 5668
1981 Ed., § 35-514.
1973 Ed., § 35-710.
D.C. Law 15-39 repealed this section.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2202(a) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2202(a) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
Short title of title XXIII of Law 15-39: Section 2301 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided that title XXIII of the act may be cited as the Life Insurance Amendment Act of 2003.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.